Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.595

Employee ownership revolving loan program account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 2047-S.SL) ***

The employee ownership revolving loan program account is created in the custody of the state treasury. All transfers and appropriations by the legislature, repayments of loans, private contributions, and all other sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of the Washington employee ownership program created in RCW 43.330.590. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2023 c 392 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2023 c 392: See notes following RCW 43.330.590.